Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB526.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:* * *(14.2) Article XVIII-I.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IVOLUNTEER CERTIFIED EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIANAND VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active volunteer certified emergency medical technician." A volunteer for a nonprofit emergency medical services agency who is certified under 35 Pa.C.S. § 79A23 (relating to certification)."Active volunteer firefighter." A volunteer for a volunteer fire company who is certified under 35 Pa.C.S. § 79A23."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Nonprofit emergency medical services agency." An emergency medical services agency as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions) that is chartered as a nonprofit corporation."Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026, and each taxable year thereafter. The term does not include amounts withheld or required to be withheld from employees under Article III.20250SB0526PN0499 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tax credit." The tax credit authorized under this article."Taxpayer." An individual subject to payment of taxes under Article III."Volunteer." A member of a volunteer fire company or a nonprofit emergency medical services agency."Volunteer fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).Section 1802-I. Application and procedure.(a) Application to department.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer by submitting an application for the tax credit in a manner required by the department. The application shall contain the following information:(1) The name and tax identification number of the taxpayer.(2) Documentation that the taxpayer meets the eligibility criteria specified in section 1803-I.(3) Any other information deemed appropriate by the department.(b) Procedure.--The application shall be attached to the applicant's annual tax return required to be filed under Article III.Section 1803-I. Taxpayer eligibility.(a) Criteria.--A taxpayer who is an active volunteer certified emergency medical technician or active volunteer firefighter shall be eligible for a tax credit if the taxpayer meets the following criteria:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has at least two full years of service as a certified emergency medical technician or volunteer 20250SB0526PN0499 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 firefighter by December 31 of the taxable year and has responded to at least 20% of the agency's or company's emergency calls during that two-year period.(3) Is an active volunteer certified emergency medical technician or active volunteer firefighter on the date the taxpayer files the tax return.(b) Maximum credit.--A taxpayer who qualifies under subsection (a) may claim a tax credit of $500.Section 1804-I. Carryover and carryback prohibited.A taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, obtain a refund of, sell or assign an unused tax credit.Section 1805-I. Self certification.The making or filing by a taxpayer of any return, declaration, statement or other document required to be made or filed under this article shall constitute a certification by the taxpayer that the statements, including the taxpayer's residency status and years of service as an active volunteer certified emergency medical technician or active volunteer firefighter, contained in the return, declaration, statement or other document are true and that any copy filed is a true copy.Section 1806-I. Guidelines.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall adopt guidelines, including forms, necessary to administer this article.(b) Joint income.--A tax credit granted under this article may be applied to the tax liability of the spouse of an eligible taxpayer if both the eligible taxpayer and the spouse report income on a joint income tax return.Section 1807-I. Report to General Assembly.No later than December 31, 2027, and each December 31 20250SB0526PN0499 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the tax credits granted under this article. The report shall include the number of active volunteer certified emergency medical technicians and active volunteer firefighters who utilized the tax credit as of the date of the report and the amount of credits approved. The report may include recommendations for changes in the calculation or administration of the tax credit. The report shall be submitted to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives. The report may include other information that the department deems appropriate.Section 1808-I. Penalty.A taxpayer who claims a credit under this article but fails to meet the standards under this article shall repay the full amount of the tax credit to the Commonwealth, plus interest as prescribed under section 351.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0526PN0499 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223